Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1684.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. School liability; bullying; serious physical injury; court action; definitions A. A student or a student's parent may bring a cause of action against a public school for damages caused by the school's failure to address a threat to the student's safety if all of the following apply: 1. The student suffers serious physical injury as a result of another student bullying the injured student at school. 2. The school or an employee of the school, including an individual who is indirectly employed through a third-party contractor, receives at least one prior report that the other student committed an act of bullying against the injured student at school. 3. The school negligently failed to address the suspected act of bullying committed by the other student and against the injured student after receiving a prior report. B. An act of alleged bullying occurs at school for the purposes of subsection A of this section if the act either: 1. Occurs while the injured student and the student who commits the act of alleged bullying are on school grounds, on school property, on a school bus, at a school bus stop, at a school-sponsored event or at a school-sponsored activity. 2. Is committed through the use of electronic technology or electronic communication on a school computer, network, forum or mailing list. C. The court may award reasonable attorney fees, expenses and damages to any claimant who substantially prevails in an action BROUGHT pursuant to this section. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Bullying" means any of the following that PLACES a student in actual and reasonable fear of harm to the student's person or damage to the student's property: (a) A pattern of gestures or written, electronic or verbal communications. (b) A physical act. (c) A threatening communication. 2. "prior report" includes: (a) A written report that any individual makes to an employee of the school. (b) A school employee's personal observation of conduct that the employee reasonably believes constitutes an act of bullying. 3. "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-105. END_STATUTE